Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska75-903.01
License; suspension or revocation; procedure.

The commission may, upon complaint filed by it or any person and after a hearing, suspend or revoke the license of any grain dealer for failure to comply with the requirements of the Grain Dealer Act or any rule or regulation adopted and promulgated pursuant to such act. The complaint shall state the grounds for suspension or revocation and shall be filed with the commission pursuant to the commission's rules of procedure. The commission shall serve the grain dealer with a copy of the complaint and a copy of the order of the commission stating the time for hearing, which shall be at least twenty days from the date of service. If the commission determines that the public good requires it, the commission may, upon the filing of a complaint and without hearing, temporarily suspend a grain dealer's license pending the determination of the complaint.

Laws 1987, LB 507, § 4.